Utah statutes.
19-4-106.   Executive secretary to board -- Appointment -- Authority.
An executive secretary to the board shall be appointed by the executive
director, with the approval of the board, and serve under the direction of the
executive director.  The executive secretary may:
(1)  develop programs to promote and protect the quality of the public
drinking water supplies of the state;
(2)  advise, consult, and cooperate with other agencies of this and other
states, the federal government, and with other groups, political subdivisions,
and industries in furtherance of the purpose of this chapter;
(3)  review plans, specifications, and other data pertinent to proposed or
expanded water supply systems to insure proper design and construction; and
(4)  as authorized by the board and subject to the provisions of this chapter,
enforce rules made by the board through the issuance of orders which may be
subsequently revoked, which rules may require:
(a)  discontinuance of use of unsatisfactory sources of drinking water;
(b)  suppliers to notify the public concerning the need to boil water; and
(c)  suppliers in accordance with existing rules, to take remedial actions
necessary to protect or improve an existing water system.
